Washington statutes.
RCW 43.320.140

Mortgage lending fraud prosecution account—Created. (Expires June 30, 2027.)

(1) The mortgage lending fraud prosecution account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from the surcharge imposed in RCW 36.22.181, except those retained by the county auditor for administration, must be deposited into the account. Except as otherwise provided in this section, expenditures from the account may be used only for criminal prosecution of fraudulent activities related to mortgage lending fraud crimes. Only the director of the department of financial institutions or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

(2) This section expires June 30, 2027.

[ 2021 c 31 s 2; 2016 c 7 s 1; 2011 c 129 s 1; 2006 c 21 s 2; 2003 c 289 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 31: See note following RCW 36.22.181.

Effective date—2011 c 129: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect June 29, 2011." [ 2011 c 129 s 3.]